Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 1 Veterans Education

38-4-30.
Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as “The Veterans Education Reorganization Act of 1949.”

History.

Ga. L. 1947, p. 1143, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 539, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38.

Cross references.

Requirements and procedures for issuing and awarding high school diplomas to honorably discharged World War II veterans, §

20-2-69

.

Academic credit for military training and experience, §

20-4-38

.

Department to fly POW-MIA flag at interstate rest areas, §

32-2-8

.

38-4-31.
Purpose of part.

It is declared to be the public policy of this state and the purpose of this part to assist veterans in securing the educational benefits to which they are entitled under any act of Congress, whenever enacted.

History.

Ga. L. 1947, p. 1143, § 2; Ga. L. 1949, p. 539, § 10.

38-4-32.
Department of Veterans Service — Agency to deal with federal government; authority to enter into contracts; administer grants.

The Department of Veterans Service is designated as the agency of this state:

To cooperate with the proper officials of the United States government in the administration of all laws of the United States conferring educational benefits upon veterans, including manual or other training, and to perform on behalf of this state such acts as may be necessary or required of the state, or any agency of the state, by any act of Congress or any regulation or directive of any federal department, agency, or other instrumentality, in the administration of any such law of the United States;

To accept and administer any federal grant to the state for the purposes enumerated in paragraph (1) of this Code section; and

To enter into contracts with the federal government for the training, placing, or supervision of veterans receiving benefits under federal laws and regulations; and for the qualification, approval, certification, and supervision of educational institutions and training establishments contemplated by any federal program for the education and training of war veterans.

History.

Ga. L. 1947, p. 1143, § 8; Ga. L. 1949, p. 539, § 4.

38-4-33.
Department of Veterans Service — Various state educational bodies to cooperate with; full realization of federal benefits.

In order to promote the full realization of all the educational advantages offered to war veterans of this state by reason of any act of Congress, regulation, directive, declaration of policy, or grant of power from the federal government, the State Board of Education, the Department of Education, the State School Superintendent, the Board of Regents and the Chancellor of the University System of Georgia, and all other public education authorities of this state shall cooperate with the Department of Veterans Service in the formulation of such educational and training policies as may conform to accepted standards of efficiency and economy.

History.

Ga. L. 1947, p. 1143, §§ 11, 12, 13; Ga. L. 1949, p. 539, § 5.

38-4-34.
Department of Veterans Service — Cooperation and coordination with private educational bodies.

In the execution of all programs for the education and training of veterans as provided in this part, the Department of Veterans Service shall cooperate with the proper officials of private schools, colleges, and universities of the state which are not under the official jurisdiction of the public educational authorities of the state in the placing of veterans at such institutions for education and training and shall, so far as possible, coordinate the programs of the private institutions with the standards of public institutions.

History.

Ga. L. 1947, p. 1143, § 14; Ga. L. 1949, p. 539, § 6.

38-4-35.
Governor authorized to create private educational advisory bodies.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to limit the power of the Governor to create or authorize the formation of such advisory bodies or voluntary groups of citizens, primarily interested in the education of veterans, as may be deemed desirable in developing the recommendation and formulation of sound educational policies covering the professional aspects involved in the execution of this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 539, § 7.

38-4-36.
Governor may direct provision of facilities to Department of Veterans Service.

In executing this part, the Governor may direct any department, division, board, bureau, commission, or other administrative agency of the state to provide such facilities, including personnel, materials, assistance, information, and data as will enable the Department of Veterans Service or the commissioner properly to utilize the same in performance of the duties prescribed by this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1947, p. 1143, § 22; Ga. L. 1949, p. 539, § 8; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 12.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section V, Paragraph I, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

38-4-37.
Veterans Service Board empowered to prescribe rules, regulations, and directives to implement programs.

The Veterans Service Board is vested with the full power and authority to make, prescribe, and enforce such reasonable rules, regulations, and directives as, in its judgment, might be necessary to implement fully, in conjunction with agencies of the federal government, the program for the education, training, and rehabilitation of veterans contemplated by state and federal legislation relating thereto; and such rules, regulations, orders, and directives in aid of this legislative scheme shall have the efficacy of law.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 539, § 11.